Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2145
Art therapist advisory committee; appointment; develop standards.

(1) The board may appoint an art therapist advisory committee, as provided in section 38-161, to assist the board in carrying out its duties under the Mental Health Practice Act.

(2) An advisory committee appointed pursuant to this section shall develop recommendations for adoption by the board and promulgation by the department on topics determined by the board as necessary to carry out its duties under the Mental Health Practice Act, including, but not limited to:

(a) Standards of competency and procedures for qualifying art therapists as licensed mental health practitioners and certified art therapists and for certification as provisional art therapists;

(b) Education standards for determining if an applicant's academic training and supervised clinical experience are substantially equivalent to an approved educational program in art therapy;

(c) Standards pertaining to the supervised practice of art therapy by certified provisional art therapists and requirements for approved supervisors;

(d) A code of ethics for the practice of art therapy for approval by the board pursuant to section 38-2138; and

(e) Standards for continuing competency and procedures for compliance with the continuing education requirements and approval of providers of continuing education.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 21.